Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska12-201
Condemnation; conditions; procedure.

Any incorporated city or village, any incorporated cemetery association, and any religious or church parish exercising ownership or control over any existing cemetery or burial ground may secure additional lands adjoining for cemetery and burial purposes in the manner hereinafter set forth. Whenever it shall become necessary to enlarge any such cemetery grounds by adding thereto lands adjoining the same and the owner or owners of such lands will not or cannot sell and convey the same to the city or village, cemetery association or parish, or where the owner or owners and the authorities controlling such cemetery cannot agree upon the price to be paid for such land so needed for cemetery extension, such land may be acquired by the exercise of the power of eminent domain. The procedure to condemn property shall be exercised as set forth in sections 76-704 to 76-724.

Laws 1915, c. 172, § 1, p. 357;

C.S.1922, § 414;

C.S.1929, § 13-201;

R.S.1943, § 12-201;

Laws 1951, c. 101, § 31, p. 460.

Village was authorized to condemn land for cemetery purposes. Hueftle v. Eustis Cemetery Assn., 171 Neb. 293, 106 N.W.2d 400 (1960).